Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 2244 (4) 91 jda/jh/md H.F. 2244 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The educational standards of 3 section 256.11 relating to the social studies curriculum for 4 grades seven through twelve. 5 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0u. Be subject to and comply with the 8 requirements of section 256.11 relating to the social studies 9 curriculum for grades seven through twelve in the same manner 10 as a school district. 11 Sec. 3. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph a, 12 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 (2) Social studies, including instruction related to civics 14 and United States government . The instruction related to 15 civics and United States government shall consist of at least 16 one-half unit of credit, or the equivalent, during grade seven 17 or grade eight. For purposes of this subparagraph, a unit of 18 credit consists of a course or equivalent related components or 19 partial units taught throughout the academic year. 20 Sec. 4. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph b, Code 21 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 b. (1) Five units of the social studies including 23 instruction in voting statutes and procedures, voter 24 registration requirements, the use of paper ballots and voting 25 systems in the election process, and the method of acquiring 26 and casting an absentee ballot. All students shall complete 27 a minimum of one-half one unit of civics and United States 28 government and one unit of United States history. 29 (2) The one-half one unit of civics and United States 30 government shall include the all of the following: 31 (a) The voting procedure as described in this lettered 32 paragraph and section 280.9A . The government instruction shall 33 also include a 34 (b) A study of the Constitution of the United States and the 35 -1- HF 2244 (4) 91 jda/jh/md 1/ 2 H.F. 2244 Bill of Rights contained in the Constitution and an assessment 1 of a studentâs knowledge of the Constitution and the Bill of 2 Rights. 3 Sec. 5. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school years 4 beginning on or after July 1, 2028. 5 -2- HF 2244 (4) 91 jda/jh/md 2/ 2